apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="compr/imere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeremmo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerei</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imereste</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeresti</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>imerebber</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerebbero</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerebbe</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeremo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerò</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerete</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerai</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>imeran</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeranno</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imerà</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imendo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imendo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantando"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imemmo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>essi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeste</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imesti</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>esser</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>essero</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>esse</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imiamo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imete</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>iman</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imano</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ima</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>imer</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imere</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imer</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
	</p><par n="S__cantar"/>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imevamo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imevo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imevate</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imevi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>imevan</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imevano</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeva</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imessimo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imessi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imeste</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imessi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>imesser</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imessero</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imesse</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>esse</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>essa</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>essi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>esso</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imiamo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imete</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imi</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>imon</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imono</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ime</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imiamo</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ima</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imiate</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ima</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>iman</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>imano</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ima</l>
	  <r>imere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="esprimere"><i>espr</i><par n="compr/imere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imprimere"><i>impr</i><par n="compr/imere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="reprimere"><i>repr</i><par n="compr/imere__vblex"/></e>
